Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 18 Commercial Vehicles

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 68, §§ 1 and 3 through 5 created a new chapter 18 of title 31, made up of new, amended and renumbered sections. For a table of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of motorbus carrier or driver for death of, or injury to, discharged passenger struck by other vehicle, 16 ALR5th 1.